Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-217
Profit, defined.

Profit shall mean the gross receipts collected from one or more bingo games, less reasonable sums necessarily and actually expended for prizes, taxes, license and permit fees, bingo equipment, the cost of renting or leasing a premises for the conduct of bingo, and other allowable expenses.

Laws 1978, LB 351, § 13;

Laws 1979, LB 164, § 2;

Laws 1984, LB 949, § 8;

R.S.Supp.,1984, § 9-136;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 18;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 20.